Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3505.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1197 of Title 12, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
HB3505 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Uniform Wage
Garnishment Act".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1198 of Title 12, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in this act:
1. "Creditor" means a person that has obtained an enforceable
money judgment against a debtor. Creditor includes a successor in
interest;
2. "Debtor" means an individual against whom a creditor has an
enforceable money judgment;
3. "Disposable earnings" means earnings remaining after
deductions for any amount required by law to be withheld;
4. "Earnings" means compensation owed by an employer to an
employee for personal services. Earnings includes a wage, salary,
commission, bonus, profit-sharing distribution, severance payment,
fee, and periodic pension or disability payment;
5. "Electronic" means relating to technology having electrical,
digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar
capabilities;
6. "Employee" means an individual, including a former employed
individual, who is owed earnings, who:
a. is treated by an employer as an employee for federal-
employment-tax purposes, or
HB3505 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

b. receives earnings from an employer through periodic
payments, and:
(1) is not treated by the employer as an employee for
federal-employment-tax purposes, and
(2) does not receive an IRS Form 1099 from the
employer;
7. "Employer" means a person that owes or will owe earnings to
an employee;
8. "Garnishee" means:
a. a person properly served with a motion under paragraph
2 of subsection B of Section 5 of this act, or
b. a person whose registered agent is served with a
motion under paragraph 1 of subsection B of Section 5
of this act;
9. "Garnishment" means a court-ordered deduction from an
employee's earnings that is then sent as a payment to a judgment
creditor;
10. "Garnishment action" means a court proceeding in which a
garnishment is sought;
11. "Named agent" means the name of and contact information for
the creditor's agent to which the garnishee is required by this act
to send information as provided for under paragraph 6 of subsection
C of Section 5 of this act;

HB3505 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

12. "Ordered deduction" means a deduction by an employer from
the earnings of an employee for payment to another person under a
garnishment action, support order, order to recover federal, state,
city, or local taxes, or administrative order issued by a federal or
state agency. Ordered deduction does not include a deduction with
the consent of the employee or for current tax obligations;
13. "Payday" means a regularly scheduled day on which an
employer pays earnings to an employee for a pay period or, if the
day of payment is uncertain or less often than once a month, the day
on which the employer pays earnings to the employee;
14. "Periodic payments" means recurring payments on set
intervals;
15. "Person" means an individual, estate, business or nonprofit
entity, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision,
agency, or instrumentality, or other legal entity;
16. "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible
medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is
retrievable in perceivable form;
17. "Send" means to:
a. deposit a record in the United States mail to the last
known address of the intended recipient with first-
class postage provided,
b. deliver a record by any other usual means of
communication to the last known address of the
HB3505 HFLR Page 5
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

intended recipient with the cost of transmission, if
any, provided, or
c. cause a record to be received in any other way within
the time it would have arrived if sent under
subparagraph a of this paragraph, including electronic
filings;
18. "Sign" means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt
a record:
a. to execute or adopt a tangible symbol, or
b. to attach to, or logically associate with the record,
an electronic symbol, sound, or process regardless of
any other state law requirement for signatures;
19. "State" means a state of the United States, the District of
Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any
territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the
United States. State includes a federally recognized Indian tribe;
and
20. "Support order" means a judgment, decree, order, decision,
or directive, whether temporary, final, or subject to modification,
issued in a state or foreign country for the benefit of a child,
spouse, or former spouse, which provides for monetary support,
health care, arrearages, retroactive support, or reimbursement for
financial assistance provided to an individual obligee in place of
child support. Support order includes related costs and fees,
HB3505 HFLR Page 6
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

inte rest, income withholding, automatic adjustment, reasonable
attorney fees, and other relief.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1199 of Title 12, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. This act applies only to a continuous garnishment action.
B. This act does not apply to:
1. A lump sum garnishment; or
2. Any remedy available to a creditor under the laws of this
state other than this act.
C. Except as otherwise provided in Section 14 of this act, this
act does not apply to an ordered deduction that is not a garnishment
including an ordered deduction:
1. Under an order of a bankruptcy court;
2. For a debt due for a federal, state, city, or local tax; or
3. Under a support order.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1200 of Title 12, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The court shall dismiss or stay a garnishment action if the
debtor's principal place of work is not in this state when the
action is commenced.


HB3505 HFLR Page 7
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1201 of Title 12, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A creditor may commence a garnishment action by filing a
motion with the court.
B. The motion shall be served:
1. On the registered agent if the employer against which the
garnishment is sought has a registered agent that can be served with
reasonable diligence under Section 2004 of Title 12 of the Oklahoma
Statutes; or
2. If paragraph 1 of this subsection does not apply, on the
employer.
C. The motion shall include:
1. The name of the debtor;
2. The last known physical and mailing addresses of the debtor
or a statement that the information is not known;
3. The amount the creditor claims is owed by the debtor and
information sufficient to identify the judgment on which the
garnishment action is based;
4. A completed notice that satisfies Section 10 of this act;
5. A Notice of Oklahoma's Rules About Garnishment that
satisfies Section 11 of this act;


HB3505 HFLR Page 8
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

6. The name of and contact information for the creditor's agent
to which the garnishee is required by this act to send information;
and
7. The mailing address to which the garnishee must send the
amount withheld and, at the creditor's option, a statement of other
reasonable means of sending the amount to the creditor.
D. When the garnishee is served, the motion shall be
accompanied by:
1. A separate document provided only to the garnishee and not
filed with the court which:
a. provides the debtor's date of birth and full Social
Security number or states that the date or number is
not known, and
b. if the debtor's full Social Security number is not
known, provides other identifying information known to
the creditor or states that no other identifying
information is known; and
2. A separate standardized form to commence garnishment which
shall include the following information:
"The debtor's name is [state name of debtor].
The debtor's last known physical address is [insert address
or check box]:
[state last known physical address]
___ physical address is not known.
HB3505 HFLR Page 9
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

The debtor's last known mailing address is [insert address
or check one of the boxes]:
[state last known mailing address if different]
___ same as the last known physical address above
___ mailing address is not known.
The debtor owes [state amount owed] based on [provide
information sufficient to identify judgment upon which
garnishment action is based].
A completed Notice of Garnishment that complies with the
Uniform Wage Garnishment Act is attached.
A Notice of Oklahoma's Rules About Garnishment that
complies with the Uniform Wage Garnishment Act is attached.
Creditor's agent is [state name of and contact information
for agent].
Employer must send amounts withheld from the debtor's
earnings to creditor at [state mailing address to which
amounts must be sent].
Instead of mailing amounts withheld to the address above,
creditor agrees that employer may instead send the amount
by the following means [state with specificity alternative
means of sending amounts withheld]".
SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1202 of Title 12, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
HB3505 HFLR Page 10
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Not later than thirty (30) calendar days after being served with
a motion in a garnishment action:
1. If one of the following grounds applies, the garnishee shall
send to the agent named under paragraph 6 of subsection C of Section
5 of this act a notice stating the applicable ground:
a. the debtor is not an employee of the garnishee,
b. the debtor's principal place of work is not in this
state and the employer is subject to jurisdiction in
the state of the debtor's principal place of work,
c. the motion does not contain all information required
by subsection C of Section 5 of this act, or
d. the motion was not accompanied by the separate
document required by paragraph 1 of subsection D of
Section 5 of this act or the document did not contain
all the required information, or
2. If paragraph 1 of this section does not apply, the garnishee
shall:
a. send to the agent named under paragraph 6 of
subsection C of Section 5 of this act and the court a
notice that includes:
(1) a statement that the named debtor is an employee
of the garnishee,
(2) the pay frequency of the employee and the date of
the next payday,
HB3505 HFLR Page 11
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

(3) the name of and contact information for the
garnishee's agent to which the creditor must send
information if required by this act, and
(4) if the employee's earnings are subject to other
ordered deductions, the number of other
deductions and the priority of each deduction,
including the priority of the garnishment sought
by the motion, and
b. send to the employee a copy of the notices provided to
the garnishee under paragraphs 4 and 5 of subsection C
of Section 5 of this act.
3. The notice required under paragraph 1 of this section shall
be in a substantially similar form and shall contain the following
information:
"To: [Named agent]
From: [State name of employer]
Date: [Insert date]
In Re: [Identify case]
As required by the Uniform Wage Garnishment Act, [state
name of employer] is sending this information to you within
twenty-one (21) days of receiving the Motion to Commence
Garnishment. This form provides you with the reason(s)
[state name of employer] is not commencing garnishment at
this time.
HB3505 HFLR Page 12
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

This is to advise you that (check all that apply):
___ The debtor named in the Motion to Commence
Garnishment is not one of our employees.
___ The principal place of work of the debtor named
in the Motion to Commence Garnishment is not in
this state.
___ The Motion to Commence Garnishment does not
contain the following required information:
___ Insufficient information to identify the
debtor
___ Amount the debtor owes was not specified
___ Insufficient information to identify the
judgment upon which garnishment is based
___ One or both notice forms were not supplied
___ Creditor's agent was not named
___ Insufficient information about where to send
withheld earnings.
___ The Motion to Commence Garnishment was not
accompanied by the separate addendum providing
confidential information to identify the debtor.
___ The separate addendum did not contain all the
required information.
___ Other [specify other reason(s)]".

HB3505 HFLR Page 13
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

4. The notice required under paragraph 2 of this section shall
be in a substantially similar form and shall contain the following
information:
"To: [Named Agent]
From: [State name of employer]
Date: [Insert date]
In Re: [Identify case]
As required by the Uniform Wage Garnishment Act, [state
name of employer] is sending this information to you within
twenty-one (21) days after being served with the Motion to
Commence Garnishment.
This is to advise you that:
(1) The debtor named in the Motion to Commence
Garnishment, [state name of debtor], is one of
our employees.
(2) The employee's pay frequency is [state pay
frequency].
(3) The employee's next payday is [state next payday
if known, otherwise state that employee's next
day of payment is uncertain].
(4) The employer's agent for purposes of this action
is [state name of and contact information for
agent].

HB3505 HFLR Page 14
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

(5) The employee's earnings are currently subject to
the following ordered deductions:
[list each ordered deduction currently in effect,
including the priority of the garnishment in this
action and the priority of each of the other
ordered deductions]".
SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1203 of Title 12, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
If paragraph 2 of Section 6 of this act applies, the employer
shall begin withholding earnings of an employee under a garnishment
action on the first payday that occurs at least thirty (30) calendar
days after the employer sends the employee the notices required
under Section 6 of this act.
SECTION 8. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1204 of Title 12, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Not later than five (5) business days after withholding an
amount from the earnings of an employee under a garnishment action,
the employer shall send the amount to the creditor at the mailing
address specified under Section 5 of this act or, at the employer's
option, by another means specified by the creditor.
B. If an employer withholds earnings from more than one
employee for the same creditor and specifies the amount attributable
HB3505 HFLR Page 15
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

to e ach employee, the employer may combine the amounts in one
payment to the creditor. The employer shall submit a form to the
creditor containing the following information:
"To: [Named agent]
From: [State name of employer]
Date: [Insert date]
In Re: One remittance for multiple employees.
This is to advise that the remittance to which this notice
relates combines amounts withheld from more than one
employee.
The total amount of the remittance is [state total amount
being remitted].
The amount attributable to each employee is as follows:
Case Name Amount
[identify case] [state employee's name] [state amount]".
C. For each payday on which a garnishment occurs, the employer
shall maintain a record sufficient to prepare for each creditor a
calculation worksheet required under Section 12 of this act. At any
time, the employee or creditor may request in a record a completed
calculation worksheet. The creditor shall send the request to the
named agent. Not later than five (5) business days after receipt of
a request, the employer shall send without charge a calculation
worksheet for the most recent payday. The employer shall not be
required to provide:
HB3505 HFLR Page 16
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

1. The employee more than one calculation worksheet for each
creditor for any payday; or
2. The creditor more than four calculation worksheets for each
employee during a calendar year.
SECTION 9. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1205 of Title 12, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Not later than twenty-one (21) calendar days after receiving
the notice required under paragraph 1 of Section 6 of this act, the
creditor shall seek dismissal of the garnishment action or a prompt
hearing under Section 18 of this act to determine whether the
garnishee is required to proceed under paragraph 2 of Section 6 of
this act. If a creditor has not sought dismissal of the garnishment
action or a hearing within twenty-one (21) calendar days after
receiving such notice, the garnishment shall be automatically
dismissed. In seeking dismissal, the creditor shall submit a form
to court with the following information:
"Creditor received a notice from the employer under the
Uniform Wage Garnishment Act stating that (check all that
apply):
___ The debtor is not an employee of the employer.
___ The debtor's principal place of work is not in
this state.

HB3505 HFLR Page 17
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

___ The Motion to Commence Garnishment used to
commence this garnishment action did not contain
all the information required by Section 5 of the
Uniform Wage Garnishment Act.
___ The Motion to Commence Garnishment used to
commence this garnishment action was not
accompanied by the separate addendum required by
Section 5 of the Uniform Wage Garnishment Act.
___ The Motion to Commence Garnishment used to
commence this garnishment action did not contain
all the information required by Section 5 of the
Uniform Wage Garnishment Act.
Creditor now moves (check one):
___ For a prompt hearing under Section 18 of the
Uniform Wage Garnishment Act to determine whether
the employer is required to proceed with
garnishment under Section 6 of the Uniform Wage
Garnishment Act.
___ To withdraw the motion seeking garnishment".
B. A garnishment commenced under Section 7 of this act
terminates when:
1. The garnishee's records indicate that the amount owed by the
employee has been paid in full; or

HB3505 HFLR Page 18
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

2. The debtor is no longer an employee of the garnishee. If a
debtor is no longer an employee of the garnishee, the employer shall
submit to the creditor a form with the following information:
"To: [Named Agent]
From: [State name of employer]
Date: [Insert date]
In Re: [Identify case]
This is to advise you that the debtor in the above-
referenced matter, [state debtor's name], is no longer one
of our employees. The first day on which the debtor was no
longer employed was [insert date]".
C. Not later than twenty-one (21) days after the first day on
which a debtor is no longer an employee of the garnishee, the
garnishee shall send the named agent notice of the end of employee's
employment.
D. A creditor shall seek dismissal of a garnishment action not
later than twenty-one (21) days after the earlier of the time:
1. The amount owed by the debtor is paid in full; or
2. The creditor receives the notice required by subsection C of
this section.
Such notice seeking dismissal of a garnishment action shall be
in a standard form containing the following information:
"Now comes [state name of creditor] to move that this
action be dismissed because (check one):
HB3505 HFLR Page 19
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

____ The debtor has paid the amount due in full.
____ The debtor is no longer an employee of the
employer.
____ Other: [state reason for dismissal]".
SECTION 10. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1206 of Title 12, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. In this section, "original creditor" means a person to which
a debtor originally owed the obligation for which a garnishment is
sought.
B. The notice required by paragraph 4 of subsection C of
Section 5 of this act shall be in substantially the following form:
NOTICE OF GARNISHMENT
MONEY WILL BE TAKEN FROM YOUR PAY IF YOU FAIL TO ACT
1. Why Am I Getting This Notice?
You are getting this notice because [name of creditor] says
you owe them money.
[Name or shortened name of creditor] has started a legal
process called "garnishment". The process requires that
money be taken from your pay and given to them to pay what
you owe. The person who pays you does not keep the money.
[Name or shortened name of creditor] filled out this form.
The law requires the person who pays you to give you this
form.
HB3505 HFLR Page 20
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

If the line below is checked, [name or shortened name of
creditor] is not the creditor you originally owed money to.
If that is the case, knowing the name of the original
creditor might help you understand why money will be taken
from your pay.
___ The amount you owe originally comes from a debt
you owed to [name of original creditor].
2. How Much Do I Owe?
[Name or shortened name of creditor] says you currently owe
$[state amount]. The amount could go up if there are more
court costs or additional interest. The amount also could
go down if you make payments to [name or shortened name of
creditor].
3. How Will The Amount I Owe Be Paid?
The person who pays you will soon be required to start
taking money from your pay. Money will continue to be
taken from your pay until the total amount you owe on this
debt is paid.
The rules about how much of your pay can be taken are
explained in the Notice of Oklahoma's Rules About
Garnishment that you received with this notice.
At any time, you can get a report that shows how the amount
taken from your pay was calculated. To receive this
report, you must write or email the person who pays you.
HB3505 HFLR Page 21
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

4. What Options Do I Have?
You have three options:
Talk with a lawyer. A lawyer can explain the
situation to you and help you decide what to do. This
office can help you find a lawyer:
[insert name and contact information for legal
aid or lawyer referral service].
Contact [insert name or shortened name of creditor].
If you can work something out with them, money might
not have to be taken from your pay. This is the
creditor's contact information:
[insert creditor's contact information].
Request a court hearing. A hearing could be helpful
if there are any disagreements about the garnishment.
For example, if you don't think you owe money. For
help in requesting a hearing, contact:
[insert name and address of appropriate entity].
5. What If I Don't Do Anything?
If you don't do anything, the law requires that money be
taken out of your pay every payday and given to [name or
shortened name of creditor]. This process continues until
you have paid off your debt.


HB3505 HFLR Page 22
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

SECTION 11. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1207 of Title 12, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The notice required by paragraph 5 of subsection C of Section 5
of this act shall:
1. Have a heading stating that it is the "Notice of Oklahoma's
Rules About Garnishment"; and
2. Reasonably inform an employee of:
a. the limit on wage garnishment under Section 13 of this
act,
b. exemptions from and limits on garnishment under law of
this state other than this act, and
c. the process for claiming exemptions from and limits on
garnishment, if any.
SECTION 12. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1208 of Title 12, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A calculation worksheet required under Section 8 of this act
shall be in substantially the following form:
GARNISHMENT: CALCULATION OF AMOUNT
Debtor:
Creditor:
For earnings paid on:
CALCULATION OF AMOUNT GARNISHED FOR THIS PAYDAY
HB3505 HFLR Page 23
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Disposable earnings:
1. Gross earnings paid to debtor: $
2. Amounts withheld:
a. Federal Social Security tax: $
b. Federal Medicare tax: $
c. Federal income tax: $
d. State income tax: $
e. City or local tax: $
f. Railroad retirement tax: $
g. Other: $
3. Total amounts withheld: $
[Sum of items in line 2(a) through (g)]
4. Disposable earnings: $
(Line 1 minus line 3)
Garnishment calculation:
5. Twenty-five (25%) of disposable earnings
(line 4): $
6. Exemption amount: $
7. Line 4 minus line 6 (if less than $0, enter $0): $
8. Enter smaller of line 5 or line 7: $
9. Amounts of other current garnishments with
higher priority (if none, enter $0): $
10. Subtract line 9 from line 8
(if less than $0, enter $0): $
HB3505 HFLR Page 24
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

11. Enter the number of other current garnishments with
the same priority, plus one: ____
12. Divide line 10 by line 11: $
The amount on line 12 is the garnishment amount for this pay
period.
STATEMENT OF AMOUNT DUE AND PAID
13. Total amount currently claimed by creditor: $
14. Amounts paid through garnishment:
a. Prior garnishments: $
b. This garnishment: $
(Line 12)
c. Total garnishments: $
15. Net amount owed after garnishments to date: $
(Line 13 minus line 14c)
SECTION 13. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1209 of Title 12, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The amount of earnings subject to garnishment may not exceed
the lesser of:
1. Twenty-five percent (25%) of disposable earnings for a
workweek; or
2. The amount by which disposable earnings for a workweek
exceed thirty (30) times the federal minimum wage required by

HB3505 HFLR Page 25
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Sect ion 6(a) of the Fair Labor Standards Act, 29 U.S.C., Section
206(a), as amended.
B. For a pay period greater than one week, the amount in
paragraph 2 of subsection A of this section shall be adjusted to be
the appropriate multiple of thirty (30) times the federal minimum
wage. In calculating the multiple, a pay period of one (1) calendar
month is deemed to be four and one-third (4 1/3) weeks.
SECTION 14. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1210 of Title 12, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. If more than one ordered deduction is in effect against an
employee of a garnishee, the following rules apply:
1. For an ordered deduction with higher priority than a
garnishment, the garnishee shall send withheld earnings to the
person entitled to the deduction before sending any withheld
earnings under paragraph 2 or 3 of this subsection. The garnishee
shall send any amounts remaining after payment under this paragraph
in accordance with paragraphs 2 and 3 of this subsection;
2. For an ordered deduction with the same priority as a
garnishment, the garnishee shall send an equal amount of the
withheld earnings to each person entitled to a deduction without
regard to the time the deduction became effective, the amount of the
debt, or any other factor; and

HB3505 HFLR Page 26
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

3. For an ordered deduction with a lower priority than a
garnishment, the garnishee shall send the amount due under
paragraphs 1 and 2 of this section before any payment is made on the
deduction.
B. Priority of an ordered deduction shall be determined under
the laws of this state other than this act.
SECTION 15. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1211 of Title 12, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A garnishee is not liable for a sanction under Section 16 of
this act unless:
1. The debtor or creditor files a motion with the court which
states with specificity the nature of the garnishee's failure to
comply with this act;
2. If the creditor files the motion under paragraph 1 of this
subsection and an agent has been named under Section 6 of this act,
the creditor sends a copy of the motion to the agent; and
3. The garnishee fails:
a. to send the information required by paragraphs 1 or 2
of Section 6 of this act not later than thirty (30)
business days after the earlier of the time the
garnishee receives a copy of the motion,
b. to begin garnishment under Section 7 of this act not
later than thirty (30) calendar days after the earlier
HB3505 HFLR Page 27
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

of the time the garnishee receives a copy of the
motion under paragraph 1 or 2 of this subsection or,
if no payday occurs at least six (6), but not later
than twenty-one (21) calendar days after receiving the
copy, to begin garnishment on the next payday later
than twenty-one (21) calendar days after the earlier
of the time the garnishee receives a copy, or
c. to remit to the creditor, not later than five (5)
business days after receiving a copy, the amount that
has been withheld from the earnings of the debtor
since garnishment began under Section 7 of this act
but not properly remitted to the creditor under
subsection A of Section 8 of this act.
B. The court may excuse, for good cause, payment of all or part
of an amount due under Section 16 of this act.
C. The motion required under paragraph 1 of subsection A of
this section shall be in a standard form containing the following
information:
"Now comes (check one):
___ [State name of creditor]
___ [State name of debtor], the debtor against whom
garnishment is sought in this action
to notify the Court and the employer has been served in a
garnishment action and has failed to comply with its
HB3505 HFLR Page 28
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

obligations under the Uniform Wage Garnishment Act in that
(check all that apply):
___ (1) The employer failed to send the information
required by Section 6 of the Uniform Wage
Garnishment Act within twenty-one (21) days of
being served with the Motion to Commence
Garnishment.
___ (2) The employer failed to send the information
required by subparagraph a of paragraph 2 of
Section 6 of the Uniform Wage Garnishment Act
within twenty-one (21) days of being served with
the Motion to Commence Garnishment.
___ (3) The employer failed to send the information
required by subparagraph b of paragraph 2 of
Section 6 of the Uniform Wage Garnishment Act
within twenty-one (21) days of being served with
the Motion to Commence Garnishment.
___ (4) The employer failed to begin garnishment on
the first payday that occurred at least thirty
(30) days after it sent the debtor the notices
under Section 6 of the Uniform Wage Garnishment
Act.
___ (5) The employer failed to remit to the creditor
amounts withheld from the earnings of the debtor
HB3505 HFLR Page 29
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

until later than five (5) business days after
withholding the amounts as required by Section 8
of the Uniform Wage Garnishment Act.
___ (6) The employer received a notice from the
creditor requiring it to change its records about
the amount the debtor owes to the creditor and
the employer failed to send to the debtor either
a copy of the notice changing the amount due or a
Calculation Worksheet as required by subsection E
of Section 8 of the Uniform Wage Garnishment Act.
___ (7) The movant sent a request for a Calculation
Worksheet on [insert date] but the employer
failed to send a Calculation Worksheet within
five (5) business days of receiving the request.
___ (8) The employer failed to send the notice
required by subsection C of Section 9 of the
Uniform Wage Garnishment Act that the debtor is
no longer an employee of the employer within
twenty-one (21) days of the first day on which
the debtor was no longer an employee.
This notice is intended to give the employer an opportunity
to cure the failure(s) alleged above. To cure, the
employer shall:

HB3505 HFLR Page 30
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Send the information required by items (1), (2), and
(3) within ten (10) business days of receiving this
motion.
Begin the garnishment required by item (4) within
twenty-one (21) days of receiving this motion or, if
no payday occurs by that time, on the next payday
after twenty-one (21) days.
Remit withheld earnings to the creditor under item (5)
within five (5) business days of receiving this
motion.
Immediately provide the information required by items
(6), (7), or (8).
If the employer does not cure the failure(s) alleged above,
the movant may seek the remedies provided by Section 16 of
the Uniform Wage Garnishment Act".
SECTION 16. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1212 of Title 12, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Subject to Section 15 of this act, the following rules apply:
1. A garnishee that fails to comply with Section 6 of this act
shall be liable to the creditor for Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each
day beginning twenty-two (22) days after service of the motion:
a. until the garnishee sends the information required by
paragraph 1 of Section 6 of this act, or
HB3505 HFLR Page 31
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

b. until the earlier of the day the garnishee sends the
information required by paragraph 2 of Section 6 of
this act or garnishment is required to begin under
Section 7 of this act;
2. A garnishee that fails to comply with Section 7 of this act
shall be liable to the creditor for the amount under that section
that should have been withheld and sent to the creditor;
3. A garnishee that fails to comply with subsection A of
Section 8 of this act shall be liable to the creditor for:
a. any amount withheld from the earnings of the employee
which the creditor did not receive because of the
garnishee's failure to send the amount properly, and
b. Twenty Dollars ($20.00) for each day beginning six (6)
business days after a payday on which the amount was
or should have been withheld and ending the day before
the amount is sent to the creditor;
4. A garnishee that fails under subsection E of Section 8 of
this act to send a calculation worksheet or a copy of the notice
received from the creditor is liable to the employee for Five
Dollars ($5.00) for each day beginning on the payday when the
worksheet or notice should have been sent and ending the day before
the garnishee sends the worksheet or notice;
5. A creditor shall apply any amount paid by a garnishee to the
creditor under this section toward reduction of the amount owed by
HB3505 HFLR Page 32
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

the debtor to the creditor. The maximum amount paid by a garnishee
under this section may not exceed the total amount owed by the
debtor in the garnishment action;
6. A reduction of the amount owed by the debtor to the creditor
under paragraph 5 of this subsection does not entitle the garnishee
to any right of reimbursement, indemnity, or subrogation against the
debtor. This paragraph may not be varied by agreement;
7. The motion seeking sanction under paragraph 1 of this
section shall be in a standard form containing the following
information:
"Now comes (check one):
___ [State name of creditor]
___ [State name of debtor], the debtor against whom
garnishment is sought in this action.
[Creditor or debtor] filed and served a Motion of Employer
Noncompliance under Section 15 of the Uniform Wage
Garnishment Act on [insert date]. The employer has not
timely cured the failure(s) identified in that motion. Now
comes [creditor] [debtor] to move that [state name of
employer] be sanctioned for its failure to comply with its
obligations under the Uniform Wage Garnishment Act in that
(check all that apply):
___ The employer failed to send the information
required by paragraph 1 of Section 6 of the
HB3505 HFLR Page 33
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Uniform Wage Garnishment Act within twenty-one
(21) days of being served with the Motion to
Commence Garnishment.
___ The employer failed to send the information
required by subparagraph a of paragraph 2 of
Section 6 of the Uniform Wage Garnishment Act
within twenty-one (21) days of being served with
the Motion to Commence Garnishment.
___ The employer failed to send the information
required by subparagraph b of paragraph 2 of
Section 6 of the Uniform Wage Garnishment Act
within twenty-one (21) days of being served with
the Motion to Commence Garnishment.
___ The employer failed to begin garnishment on the
first payday that occurred at least thirty (30)
days after it sent the debtor the notices
required under subparagraph b of paragraph 2 of
Section 6 of the Uniform Wage Garnishment Act.
___ The employer failed to remit to the creditor
amounts withheld from the earnings of the debtor
until later than five (5) business days after
withholding the amounts as required by subsection
A of Section 8 of the Uniform Wage Garnishment
Act.
HB3505 HFLR Page 34
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

___ The employer failed to send the debtor a
Calculation Worksheet or a copy of the notice
changing the amount due as required by subsection
E of Section 8 of the Uniform Wage Garnishment
Act.
___ The employer failed to send a Calculation
Worksheet to (check one or both):
___ the debtor
___ the creditor
within five (5) business days of receiving a
request for a worksheet.
___ The employer failed to send the notice required
by subsection C of Section 9 of the Uniform Wage
Garnishment Act that the debtor is no longer an
employee of the employer within twenty-one (21)
days of the first day on which the debtor was no
longer an employee".
SECTION 17. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1213 of Title 12, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. If the court determines that a creditor acted in bad faith
in seeking a garnishment under this act, the court may find the
creditor liable for:
1. An amount not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00);
HB3505 HFLR Page 35
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

2. Any amount due under subsection C of this section; and
3. Reasonable attorney fees of the garnishee and individual
whose earnings the creditor sought to garnish.
B. A garnishee or individual whose earnings the creditor sought
to garnish may send to the creditor a notice in a record stating the
reason that the garnishment is wrongful. If the creditor is
represented by an attorney, the garnishee or individual shall send
the notice to the attorney. The creditor acts in bad faith if it
fails, not later than seven (7) business days after receiving the
notice, to:
1. Take appropriate action to stop the garnishment and return
any earnings garnished during the sixty (60) days preceding receipt
of the notice and send to the garnishee or individual a notice in a
record indicating that it has done so; or
2. File a motion with the court requesting an expedited hearing
to determine whether the garnishment was wrongful.
C. A creditor that fails to comply with subsection B of this
section shall be liable for Fifty Dollars ($50.00) per day beginning
on the eighth business day after receiving the notice provided for
in subsection B of this section and ending the day before the
creditor complies with paragraph 1 of subsection B of this section.
D. A court may allocate an amount awarded under subsection A of
this section, other than attorney fees, between the garnishee and
the individual whose earnings the creditor sought to garnish, taking
HB3505 HFLR Page 36
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

into consideration which person filed the claim alleging bad faith
or sent the notice alleging wrongful garnishment, the extent of each
person's participation in the proceedings, and the harm suffered by
each person.
E. The court may, for good cause, excuse payment of all or part
of an amount due under this section.
F. This section does not limit any other remedy available under
the laws of this state to a garnishee or an individual whose
earnings a creditor sought to garnish.
G. An employer or debtor seeking sanctions under Section 17 of
this act shall submit to the court a standardized form containing
the following information:
"Now comes (check one):
___ [State name of employer]
___ [State name of debtor], the debtor against whom
garnishment is sought in this action
to move that [state name of creditor], the creditor in this
action, be sanctioned for bad faith in seeking a
garnishment under the Uniform Wage Garnishment Act because
(check all that apply):
___ The creditor was notified in a record on [insert
date] that the garnishment sought was wrongful
and failed within seven (7) business days to
either take appropriate action to stop the
HB3505 HFLR Page 37
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

garnishment and return any earnings garnished
during the sixty (60) days preceding receipt of
the notice, or file a motion with this court
requesting an expedited hearing to determine
whether the garnishment was wrongful.
___ The creditor acted in bad faith in seeking a
garnishment by:
[list and explain reasons]
The movant seeks (check all that apply):
___ [Insert amount up to $1,000] in sanctions.
___ $[ ] for failure to respond in a timely manner
to the notice provided on [insert date] that the
garnishment sought was wrongful, which is Fifty
Dollars ($50.00) for each day of non-compliance
beginning on the eighth day after the notice was
provided.
___ Reasonable attorney fees as determined by the
court".
SECTION 18. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1214 of Title 12, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A garnishee, creditor, or debtor may request the court to
hold a hearing to determine an issue arising under this act.

HB3505 HFLR Page 38
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

B. A debtor may request the court to hold a hearing to claim an
exemption from or limit on garnishment under law of this state other
than this act.
C. The court shall promptly hold a hearing requested under this
section. The court may enjoin a garnishment until the hearing can
be held.
D. A garnishee, creditor, or debtor seeking a hearing under
this section shall submit to the court a standardized form
containing the following information:
"Now comes (check one):
___ [State name of creditor]
___ [State name of employer]
___ [State name of debtor], the debtor against whom
garnishment is sought in this action
to move for a hearing to determine the following issue(s)
under the Uniform Wage Garnishment Act:
[Explain issue(s)]"
SECTION 19. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1215 of Title 12, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. An employer may not discharge or take other adverse action
against an employee because of a garnishment or attempted
garnishment.

HB3505 HFLR Page 39
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

B. Subsection A of this section shall be enforceable by the
powers, remedies, and procedures used to enforce discrimination in
employment under Section 1350 of Title 25 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 20. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1216 of Title 12, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall not affect any other law of this state that
limits or prohibits garnishment. Where there are contradictions in
state law, this act shall govern.
SECTION 21. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1217 of Title 12, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration shall
be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect
to its subject matter among states that enact it.
SECTION 22. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1217 of Title 12, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act modifies, limits, or supersedes the Electronic
Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C., Section
7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede Section
101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C., Section 7001(c), or authorize
electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section
103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C., Section 7003(b).
HB3505 HFLR Page 40
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

SECTION 23. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1218 of Title 12, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall not affect the validity or effect of a
garnishment order obtained before November 1, 2026.
SECTION 24. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON JUDICIARY AND PUBLIC SAFETY
OVERSIGHT, dated 02/26/2026 - DO PASS, As Amended and Coauthored.
















HB3505 HFLR Page 41
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.